Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.372

ORV registration.

"ORV registration" means a registration certificate or decal issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of off-road vehicles under chapter 46.09 RCW.

[ 2010 c 161 s 128.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.